dictionaries/isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX BV Y 68
SFX BV ti l .
SFX BV ti la .
SFX BV ti lo .
SFX BV ti li .
SFX BV ěti ju .
SFX BV ěti im .
SFX BV ěti iš .
SFX BV ěti i .
SFX BV ěti imo .
SFX BV ěti ite .
SFX BV ěti et .
SFX BV ti h .
SFX BV ti še .
SFX BV ti hmo .
SFX BV ti ste .
SFX BV ti hu .
SFX BV ěti eči .
SFX BV ěti eča .
SFX BV ěti eče .
SFX BV ěti imy .
SFX BV ěti imogo .
SFX BV ěti imomu .
SFX BV ěti imym .
SFX BV ěti imom .
SFX BV ěti imo .
SFX BV ěti ima .
SFX BV ěti imu .
SFX BV ěti imoj .
SFX BV ěti imoju .
SFX BV ěti imi .
SFX BV ěti ime .
SFX BV ěti imyh .
SFX BV ěti imym .
SFX BV ěti imymi .
SFX BV ti vši .
SFX BV ti všego .
SFX BV ti všemu .
SFX BV ti všim .
SFX BV ti všem .
SFX BV ti vših .
SFX BV ti všimi .
SFX BV ti vša .
SFX BV ti všu .
SFX BV ti všej .
SFX BV ti všeju .
SFX BV ti vše .
SFX BV ti ny .
SFX BV ti nogo .
SFX BV ti nomu .
SFX BV ti nym .
SFX BV ti nom .
SFX BV ti ni .
SFX BV ti ne .
SFX BV ti nyh .
SFX BV ti nymi .
SFX BV ti na .
SFX BV ti nu .
SFX BV ti noj .
SFX BV ti noju .
SFX BV ti no .
SFX BV ti nje/xPxE .
SFX BV ti nja/xPxE .
SFX BV ti nju/xPxE .
SFX BV ti njem/xPxE .
SFX BV ti nij/xPxE .
SFX BV ti njam/xPxE .
SFX BV ti njami/xPxE .
SFX BV ti njah/xPxE .

SFX BW Y 11
SFX BW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BW 0 y/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 om/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX BW h še/xPxE .

SFX BX Y 28
SFX BX 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BX y o/xBxPxE .
SFX BX y a/xPxE .
SFX BX y ogo/xPxE .
SFX BX y u/xPxE .
SFX BX y oj/xPxE .
SFX BX y om/xPxE .
SFX BX y omu/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 m/xPxE .
SFX BX y oju/xPxE .
SFX BX y i/xPxE .
SFX BX y e/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 h/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX BX oky ši/zz .
SFX BX oky šego/zz .
SFX BX oky šemu/zz .
SFX BX oky šim/zz .
SFX BX oky šem/zz .
SFX BX oky še/zz .
SFX BX oky ša/zz .
SFX BX oky šu/zz .
SFX BX oky šej/zz .
SFX BX oky šeju/zz .
SFX BX oky ših/zz .
SFX BX oky šim/zz .
SFX BX oky šimi/zz .
SFX BX soky še/xPxE .

SFX BY Y 31
SFX BY ti l .
SFX BY ti la .
SFX BY ti lo .
SFX BY ti li .
SFX BY ěti aju .
SFX BY ěti ajem .
SFX BY ěti aješ .
SFX BY ěti aje .
SFX BY ěti ajemo .
SFX BY ěti ajete .
SFX BY ěti ajut .
SFX BY ti h .
SFX BY ti še .
SFX BY ti hmo .
SFX BY ti ste .
SFX BY ti hu .
SFX BY ěti aj .
SFX BY ěti ajmo .
SFX BY ěti ajte .
SFX BY ěti ajuči .
SFX BY ěti ajuča .
SFX BY ěti ajuče .
SFX BY ěti ajemy .
SFX BY ěti ajema .
SFX BY ti vši .
SFX BY ti vša .
SFX BY ti vše .
SFX BY ti ny .
SFX BY ti na .
SFX BY ti no .
SFX BY ti nje .

SFX BZ Y 31
SFX BZ ti l .
SFX BZ ti la .
SFX BZ ti lo .
SFX BZ ti li .
SFX BZ ti ju .
SFX BZ ti jem .
SFX BZ ti ješ .
SFX BZ ti je .
SFX BZ ti jemo .
SFX BZ ti jete .
SFX BZ ti jut .
SFX BZ ti h .
SFX BZ ti še .
SFX BZ ti hmo .
SFX BZ ti ste .
SFX BZ ti hu .
SFX BZ ti j .
SFX BZ ti jmo .
SFX BZ ti jte .
SFX BZ ti juči .
SFX BZ ti juča .
SFX BZ ti juče .
SFX BZ ti jemy .
SFX BZ ti jema .
SFX BZ ti vši .
SFX BZ ti vša .
SFX BZ ti vše .
SFX BZ ti ny .
SFX BZ ti na .
SFX BZ ti no .
SFX BZ ti nje .

SFX Ba Y 28
SFX Ba 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ba y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Ba y a/xPxE .
SFX Ba y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Ba y u/xPxE .
SFX Ba y oj/xPxE .
SFX Ba y om/xPxE .
SFX Ba y omu/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ba y oju/xPxE .
SFX Ba y i/xPxE .
SFX Ba y e/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ba gy žějši/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšego/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšemu/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšim/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšem/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějše/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějša/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšu/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšej/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšeju/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějših/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšim/zz .
SFX Ba gy žějšimi/zz .
SFX Ba gy žeje/zz .

SFX Bb Y 11
SFX Bb 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bb 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Bb h še/xPxE .

SFX Bc Y 80
SFX Bc ti l .
SFX Bc ti la .
SFX Bc ti lo .
SFX Bc ti li .
SFX Bc ati u .
SFX Bc ati em .
SFX Bc ati eš .
SFX Bc ati e .
SFX Bc ati emo .
SFX Bc ati ete .
SFX Bc ati ut .
SFX Bc ti h .
SFX Bc ti še .
SFX Bc ti hmo .
SFX Bc ti ste .
SFX Bc ti hu .
SFX Bc ati i .
SFX Bc ati imo .
SFX Bc ati ite .
SFX Bc ati uči .
SFX Bc ati učego .
SFX Bc ati učemu .
SFX Bc ati učim .
SFX Bc ati učem .
SFX Bc ati učih .
SFX Bc ati učimi .
SFX Bc ati uča .
SFX Bc ati uču .
SFX Bc ati učej .
SFX Bc ati učeju .
SFX Bc ati uče .
SFX Bc ati emy .
SFX Bc ati emogo .
SFX Bc ati emomu .
SFX Bc ati emym .
SFX Bc ati emom .
SFX Bc ati emo .
SFX Bc ati ema .
SFX Bc ati emu .
SFX Bc ati emoj .
SFX Bc ati emoju .
SFX Bc ati emi .
SFX Bc ati eme .
SFX Bc ati emyh .
SFX Bc ati emym .
SFX Bc ati emymi .
SFX Bc ti vši .
SFX Bc ti všego .
SFX Bc ti všemu .
SFX Bc ti všim .
SFX Bc ti všem .
SFX Bc ti vših .
SFX Bc ti všimi .
SFX Bc ti vša .
SFX Bc ti všu .
SFX Bc ti všej .
SFX Bc ti všeju .
SFX Bc ti vše .
SFX Bc ti ny .
SFX Bc ti nogo .
SFX Bc ti nomu .
SFX Bc ti nym .
SFX Bc ti nom .
SFX Bc ti ni .
SFX Bc ti ne .
SFX Bc ti nyh .
SFX Bc ti nymi .
SFX Bc ti na .
SFX Bc ti nu .
SFX Bc ti noj .
SFX Bc ti noju .
SFX Bc ti no .
SFX Bc ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Bc ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Bd Y 11
SFX Bd i e/xPxE .
SFX Bd i a/xPxE .
SFX Bd i ego/xBxPxE .
SFX Bd i u/xPxE .
SFX Bd i ej/xPxE .
SFX Bd i em/xPxE .
SFX Bd i emu/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bd i eju/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX Be Y 28
SFX Be 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Be y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Be y a/xPxE .
SFX Be y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Be y u/xPxE .
SFX Be y oj/xPxE .
SFX Be y om/xPxE .
SFX Be y omu/xPxE .
SFX Be 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Be y oju/xPxE .
SFX Be y i/xPxE .
SFX Be y e/xPxE .
SFX Be 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Be 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Be ky ši/zz .
SFX Be ky šego/zz .
SFX Be ky šemu/zz .
SFX Be ky šim/zz .
SFX Be ky šem/zz .
SFX Be ky še/zz .
SFX Be ky ša/zz .
SFX Be ky šu/zz .
SFX Be ky šej/zz .
SFX Be ky šeju/zz .
SFX Be ky ših/zz .
SFX Be ky šim/zz .
SFX Be ky šimi/zz .
SFX Be ky že/xPxE .

SFX Bf Y 4
SFX Bf a ě .
SFX Bf a oh .
SFX Bf a om .
SFX Bf a oma .

SFX Bg Y 80
SFX Bg ti l .
SFX Bg ti la .
SFX Bg ti lo .
SFX Bg ti li .
SFX Bg ti nu .
SFX Bg ti nem .
SFX Bg ti neš .
SFX Bg ti ne .
SFX Bg ti nemo .
SFX Bg ti nete .
SFX Bg ti nut .
SFX Bg ti h .
SFX Bg ti še .
SFX Bg ti hmo .
SFX Bg ti ste .
SFX Bg ti hu .
SFX Bg ti ni .
SFX Bg ti nimo .
SFX Bg ti nite .
SFX Bg ti nuči .
SFX Bg ti nučego .
SFX Bg ti nučemu .
SFX Bg ti nučim .
SFX Bg ti nučem .
SFX Bg ti nučih .
SFX Bg ti nučimi .
SFX Bg ti nuča .
SFX Bg ti nuču .
SFX Bg ti nučej .
SFX Bg ti nučeju .
SFX Bg ti nuče .
SFX Bg ti nemy .
SFX Bg ti nemogo .
SFX Bg ti nemomu .
SFX Bg ti nemym .
SFX Bg ti nemom .
SFX Bg ti nemo .
SFX Bg ti nema .
SFX Bg ti nemu .
SFX Bg ti nemoj .
SFX Bg ti nemoju .
SFX Bg ti nemi .
SFX Bg ti neme .
SFX Bg ti nemyh .
SFX Bg ti nemym .
SFX Bg ti nemymi .
SFX Bg ti vši .
SFX Bg ti všego .
SFX Bg ti všemu .
SFX Bg ti všim .
SFX Bg ti všem .
SFX Bg ti vših .
SFX Bg ti všimi .
SFX Bg ti vša .
SFX Bg ti všu .
SFX Bg ti všej .
SFX Bg ti všeju .
SFX Bg ti vše .
SFX Bg ti ny .
SFX Bg ti nogo .
SFX Bg ti nomu .
SFX Bg ti nym .
SFX Bg ti nom .
SFX Bg ti ni .
SFX Bg ti ne .
SFX Bg ti nyh .
SFX Bg ti nymi .
SFX Bg ti na .
SFX Bg ti nu .
SFX Bg ti noj .
SFX Bg ti noju .
SFX Bg ti no .
SFX Bg ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Bg ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Bh Y 62
SFX Bh ti l .
SFX Bh ti la .
SFX Bh ti lo .
SFX Bh ti li .
SFX Bh zeti ozmu .
SFX Bh zeti ozmem .
SFX Bh zeti ozmeš .
SFX Bh zeti ozme .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemo .
SFX Bh zeti ozmete .
SFX Bh zeti ozmut .
SFX Bh ti h .
SFX Bh ti še .
SFX Bh ti hmo .
SFX Bh ti ste .
SFX Bh ti hu .
SFX Bh zeti ozmi .
SFX Bh zeti ozmimo .
SFX Bh zeti ozmite .
SFX Bh zeti ozmuči .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučego .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučemu .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučim .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučem .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučih .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučimi .
SFX Bh zeti ozmuča .
SFX Bh zeti ozmuču .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučej .
SFX Bh zeti ozmučeju .
SFX Bh zeti ozmuče .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemy .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemogo .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemomu .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemym .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemom .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemo .
SFX Bh zeti ozmema .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemu .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemoj .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemoju .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemi .
SFX Bh zeti ozmeme .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemyh .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemym .
SFX Bh zeti ozmemymi .
SFX Bh ti vši .
SFX Bh ti všego .
SFX Bh ti všemu .
SFX Bh ti všim .
SFX Bh ti všem .
SFX Bh ti vših .
SFX Bh ti všimi .
SFX Bh ti vša .
SFX Bh ti všu .
SFX Bh ti všej .
SFX Bh ti všeju .
SFX Bh ti vše .
SFX Bh i y .
SFX Bh i a .
SFX Bh i o .
SFX Bh i je .

SFX Bi Y 3
SFX Bi e ih .
SFX Bi e im .
SFX Bi e imi .

SFX Bj Y 10
SFX Bj 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bj 0 e/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 em/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX Bk Y 11
SFX Bk 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bk 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bk ot ti/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot ta/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot tov/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot tu/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot tah/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot tam/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot tom/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot tami/xPxE .
SFX Bk ot te/xPxE .

SFX Bl Y 6
SFX Bl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bl 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bl ok ka/xPxE .
SFX Bl ok ku/xPxE .
SFX Bl ok kom/xPxE .
SFX Bl ok če/xPxE .

SFX Bm Y 9
SFX Bm 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bm o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bm o a/xPxE .
SFX Bm lo el/xPxE .
SFX Bm o u/xPxE .
SFX Bm o ah/xPxE .
SFX Bm o am/xPxE .
SFX Bm 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bm o ami/xPxE .

SFX Bn Y 28
SFX Bn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bn y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Bn y a/xPxE .
SFX Bn y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Bn y u/xPxE .
SFX Bn y oj/xPxE .
SFX Bn y om/xPxE .
SFX Bn y omu/xPxE .
SFX Bn 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bn y oju/xPxE .
SFX Bn y i/xPxE .
SFX Bn y e/xPxE .
SFX Bn 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bn 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Bn ky ši/zz .
SFX Bn ky šego/zz .
SFX Bn ky šemu/zz .
SFX Bn ky šim/zz .
SFX Bn ky šem/zz .
SFX Bn ky še/zz .
SFX Bn ky ša/zz .
SFX Bn ky šu/zz .
SFX Bn ky šej/zz .
SFX Bn ky šeju/zz .
SFX Bn ky ših/zz .
SFX Bn ky šim/zz .
SFX Bn ky šimi/zz .
SFX Bn ky še/xPxE .

SFX Bo Y 68
SFX Bo ti l .
SFX Bo ti la .
SFX Bo ti lo .
SFX Bo ti li .
SFX Bo ziti žu .
SFX Bo ti m .
SFX Bo ti š .
SFX Bo ti 0 .
SFX Bo ti mo .
SFX Bo i e .
SFX Bo iti et .
SFX Bo ti h .
SFX Bo ti še .
SFX Bo ti hmo .
SFX Bo ti ste .
SFX Bo ti hu .
SFX Bo iti eči .
SFX Bo iti eča .
SFX Bo iti eče .
SFX Bo ti my .
SFX Bo ti mogo .
SFX Bo ti momu .
SFX Bo ti mym .
SFX Bo ti mom .
SFX Bo ti mo .
SFX Bo ti ma .
SFX Bo ti mu .
SFX Bo ti moj .
SFX Bo ti moju .
SFX Bo ti mi .
SFX Bo ti me .
SFX Bo ti myh .
SFX Bo ti mym .
SFX Bo ti mymi .
SFX Bo ti vši .
SFX Bo ti všego .
SFX Bo ti všemu .
SFX Bo ti všim .
SFX Bo ti všem .
SFX Bo ti vših .
SFX Bo ti všimi .
SFX Bo ti vša .
SFX Bo ti všu .
SFX Bo ti všej .
SFX Bo ti všeju .
SFX Bo ti vše .
SFX Bo ziti ženy .
SFX Bo ziti ženogo .
SFX Bo ziti ženomu .
SFX Bo ziti ženym .
SFX Bo ziti ženom .
SFX Bo ziti ženi .
SFX Bo ziti žene .
SFX Bo ziti ženyh .
SFX Bo ziti ženymi .
SFX Bo ziti žena .
SFX Bo ziti ženu .
SFX Bo ziti ženoj .
SFX Bo ziti ženoju .
SFX Bo ziti ženo .
SFX Bo ziti ženje/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženja/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženju/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženjem/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženij/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženjam/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženjami/xPxE .
SFX Bo ziti ženjah/xPxE .

SFX Bp Y 13
SFX Bp in no .
SFX Bp in na .
SFX Bp in nogo .
SFX Bp in nu .
SFX Bp in noj .
SFX Bp in nom .
SFX Bp in nomu .
SFX Bp in nym .
SFX Bp in noju .
SFX Bp in ni .
SFX Bp in ne .
SFX Bp in nyh .
SFX Bp in nymi .

SFX Bq Y 11
SFX Bq 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Bq ec ce/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec ca/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec cev/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec cu/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec cah/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec cam/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec cem/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec cami/xPxE .
SFX Bq ec če/xPxE .
